South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4257.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 59-5-65(4) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (4) Establish on or before July 1, 1985, regulations prescribing a uniform system of enforcement by the various school districts of the state compulsory attendance laws and regulations promulgated pursuant to Section 59-65-90. This uniform system of enforcement must require, or be construed to require, administrators to approve student absences required for participation in any interscholastic activity authorized for student participation by the school or school district, regardless of whether the activity is sanctioned by the South Carolina High School League or other entity that governs, sanctions, or operates interscholastic athletic and intramural activities and competitions. SECTION 2.  Section 59-65-90 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 59-65-90.  (A) The State Board of Education shall establish regulations defining lawful and unlawful absences beyond those specifically named in this article and additional regulations as are necessary for the orderly enrollment of pupils so as to provide for uniform dates of entrance. These regulations shall require: (1) that school officials shall immediately intervene to encourage the student's future attendance when the student has three consecutive unlawful absences or a total of five unlawful absences; and (2) that the district board of trustees or its designee shall promptly approve or disapprove any student absence in excess of ten days.; and (3) require administrators to approve student absences required for participation in any interscholastic activity approved for student participation by the school or school district, regardless of whether the activity is sanctioned by the South Carolina High School League or other interscholastic sanctioning organization. (B) As used in this section, "intervene" means to identify the reasons for the child's continued absence and to develop a plan in conjunction with the student and his parent or guardian to improve his future attendance. (C) Provided, However, That nothing withinNo provision in this section shall interfere with the Board's authority to at any time refer a child to a truancy prevention program or to the court pursuant to Section 59-65-50. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----